apertium-ido.ido.TEST.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular/Plural"/>
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc" c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii" c="Past indicative"/>
    <sdef n="fti" c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni" c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Pentekosto">
      <i>Pentekost</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="akrobato">
      <i>akrobat</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="anorexio">
      <i>anorexi</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="atleto">
      <i>atlet</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="bilgo">
      <i>bilg</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="buxo">
      <i>bux</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="cirkuito">
      <i>cirkuit</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="dinastio">
      <i>dinasti</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="embarko">
      <i>embark</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="falango">
      <i>falang</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="forko">
      <i>fork</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="gento">
      <i>gent</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="hemoragio">
      <i>hemoragi</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="jargono">
      <i>jargon</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="karato">
      <i>karat</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kloroplasto">
      <i>kloroplast</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kontrabaso">
      <i>kontrabas</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kutio">
      <i>kuti</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="lotuso">
      <i>lotus</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="meduzo">
      <i>meduz</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="motivo">
      <i>motiv</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="oceano">
      <i>ocean</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="pipo">
      <i>pip</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="regento">
      <i>regent</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="silvo">
      <i>silv</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="tenebrionido">
      <i>tenebrionid</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="zefiro">
      <i>zefir</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Bulgaria">
      <i>Bulgari</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Etolia">
      <i>Etoli</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="India">
      <i>Indi</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Macedonia">
      <i>Macedoni</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Rusia">
      <i>Rusi</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Usa">
      <i>Us</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="alta">
      <i>alt</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="atomala">
      <i>atom</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="brunatra">
      <i>brun</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="chipa">
      <i>chip</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="diatonika">
      <i>diatonik</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="efemera">
      <i>efemer</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="exotika">
      <i>exotik</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="fiktivajo">
      <i>fiktiv</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="geografia">
      <i>geografi</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="horizontale">
      <i>horizont</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="insistanta">
      <i>insist</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="katolika">
      <i>katolik</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="konstanta">
      <i>konstant</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="lauta">
      <i>laut</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="materiajo">
      <i>materi</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="nasionala">
      <i>nasional</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="perena">
      <i>peren</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="propra">
      <i>propr</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="sekundara">
      <i>sekundar</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="spolianto">
      <i>spoli</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="vehanto">
      <i>veh</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Herefordshire">
      <i>Herefordshir</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Seine">
      <i>Sein</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="acensebla">
      <i>acens</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="apene">
      <i>apen</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="balde">
      <i>bald</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="brokante">
      <i>brokant</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="buxeto">
      <i>bux</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="cerizea">
      <i>ceriz</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="chasteso">
      <i>chast</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="debochema">
      <i>deboch</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="digneso">
      <i>dign</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="duesma">
      <i>du</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="febleskar">
      <i>febl</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="glasedo">
      <i>glas</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="hike">
      <i>hik</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="infre">
      <i>infr</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="jaketo">
      <i>jak</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kombusteblajo">
      <i>kombust</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="lanceto">
      <i>lanc</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="morge">
      <i>morg</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="perfekteso">
      <i>perfekt</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="qualeso">
      <i>qual</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ruzema">
      <i>ruz</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="solideso">
      <i>solid</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="splinema">
      <i>splin</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="tante">
      <i>tant</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="vivema">
      <i>viv</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="almonar">
      <i>almon</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="arogar">
      <i>arog</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="balayar">
      <i>balay</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="bruisar">
      <i>bruis</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="debatar">
      <i>debat</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="demandar">
      <i>demand</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="dividar">
      <i>divid</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="emundar">
      <i>emund</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="expansar">
      <i>expans</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="flugar">
      <i>flug</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="gratifikar">
      <i>gratifik</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="influar">
      <i>influ</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="jenar">
      <i>jen</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kombatar">
      <i>kombat</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="konocar">
      <i>konoc</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kreiar">
      <i>krei</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="lotriar">
      <i>lotri</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="montrar">
      <i>montr</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="pafar">
      <i>paf</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="plantacar">
      <i>plantac</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="pronuncar">
      <i>pronunc</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="regenerar">
      <i>regener</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="retretar">
      <i>retret</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="semar">
      <i>sem</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="splinar">
      <i>splin</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="surprizar">
      <i>surpriz</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="visar">
      <i>vis</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
